Utah statutes.
41-3-504.   Special plates -- Display.
Special plates issued to dealers, dismantlers, manufacturers, remanufacturers,
and transporters for the purpose of operating or moving motor vehicles on the
highway under the provisions of this chapter shall be:
(1)  prominently displayed on the rear of the motor vehicle where clearly
visible;
(2)  free from foreign materials;
(3)  clearly legible; and
(4)  securely fastened in a horizontal position.
